Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.712

[Art. 98] Noncompliance with procedural rules.

Any person subject to this code who:

(1) Is responsible for unnecessary delay in the disposition of any case of a person accused of an offense under this code; or

(2) Knowingly and intentionally fails to enforce or comply with any provision of this code regulating the proceedings before, during, or after trial of an accused;

shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 1963 c 220 s 97.]